Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Article I. Statement of Purpose, Findings and Declaration of Policy

§ 1801.
Statement of purpose, findings, and declaration of policy.

The purpose of this compact is to recognize by constitutional prerequisite the interstate character of the northeast dairy industry and to form an Interstate Commission for the northeast region. The mission of the Commission is to take such steps as are necessary to assure the continued viability of dairy farming in the northeast, and to assure consumers of an adequate, local supply of pure and wholesome milk.

The participating states find and declare that the dairy industry is the paramount agricultural activity of the northeast. Dairy farms, and associated suppliers, marketers, processors, and retailers, are an integral component of the region’s economy. Their ability to provide a stable, local supply of pure, wholesome milk is a matter of great importance to the health and welfare of the region.

The participating states further find that dairy farms are essential to the region’s rural communities and character. The farms preserve open spaces, sculpt the landscape, and provide the land base for a diversity of recreational pursuits. In defining the rural character of our communities and landscape, dairy farms also provide a major draw for our tourist industries.

By entering into this compact, the participating states affirm that their ability to regulate the price which northeast dairy farmers receive for their product is essential to the public interest.

Assurance of a fair and equitable price for dairy farmers ensures their ability to provide milk to the market and the vitality of the northeast dairy industry, with all the associated benefits.

Recent, dramatic price fluctuations, with a pronounced downward trend, threaten the viability and stability of the northeast dairy region. Historically, individual state regulatory action has been an effective emergency remedy available to farmers confronting a distressed market. The federal order system, implemented by the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, establishes only minimum prices for dairy products, without preempting the power of states to regulate milk prices above the minimum levels so established. Based on this authority, each state in the region has individually attempted to implement at least one regulatory program in response to the current dairy industry crisis.

In today’s regional dairy marketplace, cooperative rather than individual state action may address more effectively the market disarray. Under our constitutional system, properly authorized, states acting cooperatively may exercise more power to regulate interstate commerce than they may assert individually without such authority. For this reason, the participating states invoke their authority to act in common agreement, with the consent of Congress, under the compact clause of the Constitution.

In establishing their constitutional regulatory authority over the region’s fluid milk market by this compact, the participating states declare their purpose that this compact neither displace the federal order system nor encourage the merging of federal orders. Specific provisions of the compact itself set forth this basic principle.

Designed as a flexible mechanism able to adjust to changes in a regulated marketplace, the compact also contains a contingency provision should the federal order system be discontinued. In that event, the Interstate Commission is authorized to regulate the marketplace in replacement of the order system. This contingent authority does not anticipate such a change, however, and should not be so construed. It is only provided should developments in the market other than establishment of this compact result in discontinuance of the order system.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.